Illinois, session 104th, SB3257.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 2-130 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/2-130)7    Sec. 2-130. User of automated license plate readers; 8prohibitions.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Automated license plate reader" or "ALPR" means a camera 11or system of cameras using computer algorithms to convert 12images of license plates into automated computer-recognized 13searchable alphanumeric data an electronic device that is 14mounted on a law enforcement vehicle or positioned in a 15stationary location and that is capable of recording data on 16or taking a photograph of a vehicle or its license plate and 17comparing the collected data and photographs to existing law 18enforcement databases for investigative purposes. "Automated 19license plate reader" or "ALPR" includes a device that is 20owned or operated by a person or an entity other than a law 21enforcement agency to the extent that data collected by the 22reader is shared with a law enforcement agency.23    "ALPR information" means information gathered by an ALPR   SB3257- 2 -LRB104 17814 LNS 31247 b1or created from the analysis of data generated by an ALPR. 2    "ALPR systems" means multi-agency or vendor agreements 3that allow the sharing of ALPR information collected in 4Illinois.5    "ALPR user" means a person or entity that owns or operates 6an ALPR device. 7    "Law enforcement agency" means a State or local agency, 8unit of local government, or private entity charged with the 9enforcement of State, county, or municipal laws or with 10managing custody of detained persons in any state or 11jurisdiction.12    (b) An ALPR user shall not sell, share, allow access to, or 13transfer ALPR information to any state or local jurisdiction 14for the purpose of investigating or enforcing a law that:15        (1) denies or interferes with a person's right to 16    choose or obtain reproductive health care services or any 17    lawful health care services as defined by the Lawful 18    Health Care Activity Act; or19        (2) permits the detention or investigation of a person 20    based on the person's immigration status.21    (c) Any ALPR user in this State, including any law 22enforcement agency of this State that uses ALPR systems, shall 23not share ALPR information with an out-of-state law 24enforcement agency without first obtaining a written 25declaration from the out-of-state law enforcement agency that 26it expressly affirms that ALPR information obtained shall not   SB3257- 3 -LRB104 17814 LNS 31247 b1be used in a manner that violates subsection (b). If a written 2declaration of affirmation is not executed, the law 3enforcement agency shall not share the ALPR information with 4the out-of-state law enforcement agency.5    (d) ALPR information shall be held confidentially to the 6fullest extent permitted by law.7    (e) Nothing in this Act shall define or limit any rights 8under the Reproductive Health Act.9    (f) A law enforcement agency may retain ALPR system 10detection records for 5 years after the date of the creation of 11the records. The detection records shall be archived 90 days 12after the creation of the records unless the information is 13relevant to an ongoing investigation or pending criminal trial 14and shall be accessed only for use in a felony criminal 15investigation or an investigation into police misconduct. Any 16detection records that are older than 90 days shall only be 17accessed with the written approval of the law enforcement 18agency head or the law enforcement agency head's designee. All 19detection records archived after 90 days shall not be 20searchable by out-of-state agencies. All detection records 21must be destroyed 5 years after the records were created 22unless the information is relevant to an ongoing investigation 23or pending criminal trial. The Illinois State Police shall 24retain ALPR detection records for a period that is consistent 25with the provisions of the Expressway Camera Act and the State 26Records Act.  SB3257- 4 -LRB104 17814 LNS 31247 b1(Source: P.A. 103-540, eff. 1-1-24.)